Utah statutes.
62A-5b-103.   Rights and privileges of a person with a disability.

(1)  A person with a disability has the same rights and privileges in the use of highways, streets, sidewalks, walkways, public buildings, public facilities, and other public areas as  a person who is not a person with a disability.

(2)  A person with a disability has equal rights to accommodations, advantages, and facilities offered by common carriers, including air carriers, railroad carriers, motor buses, motor vehicles, water carriers, and all other modes of public conveyance in this state.

(3)  A person with a disability has equal rights to accommodations, advantages, and facilities offered by hotels, motels, lodges, and all other places of public accommodation in this state, and to places of amusement or resort to which the public is invited.

(4) (a)  A person with a disability has equal rights and access to public and private housing accommodations offered for rent, lease, or other compensation in this state.

(b)  This chapter does not require a person renting, leasing, or selling private housing or real property to modify the housing or property in order to accommodate a person with a disability or to provide a higher degree of care for that person than for someone who is not a person with a disability.

(c)  A person renting, leasing, or selling private housing or real property to a person with a disability shall comply with the provisions of Section 62A-5b-104, regarding the right of the person to be accompanied by a service animal specially trained for that purpose.

